New Jersey, session 222, A4566.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a. For the purposes of this section: Municipally-operated emergency shelter for the homeless means an emergency shelter for the homeless as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1985, c.48 (C.55:13C-2) that is in operation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section. b.  Each municipality in the State shall either: (1)  operate, or partner with a private, nonprofit organization to operate, an emergency shelter for the homeless located within the municipality; or (2)  pay to the county in which the municipality is located an amount equal to $5 multiplied by the total population of the municipality according to the most recent federal decennial census, to be held in an account maintained by the county for the purposes of subsection b. of this section. b.  A county that receives payment from a municipality and maintains an account pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection b. of this section shall annually distribute the monies received to each municipally-operated emergency shelter for the homeless located in the county in amounts based upon the population of homeless individuals served annually by each municipally-operated emergency shelter for the homeless as a proportion of the total population of homeless individuals served annually in the county. c.  A municipality may utilize monies collected pursuant to section 15 of P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-133) to offset costs associated with subsection b. of this section. d.  Each emergency shelter for the homeless in operation as required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section, shall utilize the Homeless Management Information System administered by the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, or the Office of Homelessness Prevention if the Homeless Management Information System is transferred pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection e. of section 1 of P.L.2019, c.73 (C.52:27D-287.5) to provide real-time information about the occupancy status of available shelter beds. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.